Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-605
Contract for invention development services; written report; contents.

With respect to every contract for invention development services, the invention developer shall deliver to the customer at the address specified in the contract, at least at quarterly intervals throughout the term of the contract, a written report which identifies the contract and which includes:

(1) A full, clear, and concise description of the services performed up to the date of the report and of the services yet to be performed; and

(2) The name and address of each and every person, firm, or corporation to whom the subject matter of the contract has been disclosed, the reason for each and every disclosure, the nature of the disclosure, and copies of all responses received as a result of those disclosures.

Laws 1991, LB 96, § 5.